District of Columbia statutes.
34-1312.10

District’s interest in DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Property.

The District’s property ownership interest in the DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Property shall be effective and perfected against all third parties and shall not be affected or impaired by, among other things, the occurrence of any one or more of the following:

(1)

Comingling of DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Charges or DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Revenue with other amounts;

(2)

Any recourse that the electric company may have against the District;

(3)

The obligation of the electric company acting in an agency capacity in accordance with the servicing agreement to collect DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Revenue and to remit the DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Revenue so collected to the trustee; and

(4)

Any subsequent order of the Commission amending the financing order pursuant to this chapter.

May 3, 2014, D.C. Law 20-102, § 210, 61 DCR 1882